ru_RU.aff
SFX Y   наться онитесь     гнаться
SFX Y   нать  онит        гнать
SFX Y   наться онится      гнаться
SFX Y   нать  онят        гнать
SFX Y   наться онятся      гнаться
SFX Y   хать  шу          хать
SFX Y   хаться шусь        хаться
SFX Y   хать  шем         хать
SFX Y   хаться шемся       хаться
SFX Y   хать  шешь        хать
SFX Y   хаться шешься      хаться
SFX Y   хать  шете        хать
SFX Y   хаться шетесь      хаться
SFX Y   хать  шет         хать
SFX Y   хаться шется       хаться
SFX Y   хать  шут         хать
SFX Y   хаться шутся       хаться
SFX Y   есть  ту          честь
SFX Y   есть  тём         честь
SFX Y   есть  тёшь        честь
SFX Y   есть  тёте        честь
SFX Y   есть  тёт         честь
SFX Y   есть  тут         честь
SFX Y   есть  яду         сесть
SFX Y   есть  ядем        сесть
SFX Y   есть  ядешь       сесть
SFX Y   есть  ядете       сесть
SFX Y   есть  ядет        сесть
SFX Y   есть  ядут        сесть
SFX Y   ть    у           лезть
SFX Y   ть    ем          лезть
SFX Y   ть    ешь         лезть
SFX Y   ть    ете         лезть
SFX Y   ть    ет          лезть
SFX Y   ть    ут          лезть
SFX Y   сть   ду          асть
SFX Y   сться дусь        асться
SFX Y   сть   дём         асть
SFX Y   сться дёмся       асться
SFX Y   сть   дёшь        асть
SFX Y   сться дёшься      асться
SFX Y   сть   дёте        асть
SFX Y   сться дётесь      асться
SFX Y   сть   дёт         асть
SFX Y   сться дётся       асться
SFX Y   сть   дут         асть
SFX Y   сться дутся       асться
SFX Y   ять   ну          мять
SFX Y   яться нусь        мяться
SFX Y   ять   нём         мять
SFX Y   яться нёмся       мяться
SFX Y   ять   нёшь        мять
SFX Y   яться нёшься      мяться
SFX Y   ять   нёте        мять
SFX Y   яться нётесь      мяться
SFX Y   ять   нёт         мять
SFX Y   яться нётся       мяться
SFX Y   ять   нут         мять
SFX Y   яться нутся       мяться
SFX Y   и     у           расти
SFX Y   и     ём          расти
SFX Y   и     ёшь         расти
SFX Y   и     ёте         расти
SFX Y   и     ёт          расти
SFX Y   и     ут          расти
SFX Y   сти   ду          вести
SFX Y   стись дусь        вестись
SFX Y   сти   дём         вести
SFX Y   стись дёмся       вестись
SFX Y   сти   дёшь        вести
SFX Y   стись дёшься      вестись
SFX Y   сти   дёте        вести
SFX Y   стись дётесь      вестись
SFX Y   сти   дёт         вести
SFX Y   стись дётся       вестись
SFX Y   сти   дут         вести
SFX Y   стись дутся       вестись
SFX Y   сти   ту          лести
SFX Y   стись тусь        лестись
SFX Y   сти   тём         лести
SFX Y   стись тёмся       лестись
SFX Y   сти   тёшь        лести
SFX Y   стись тёшься      лестись
SFX Y   сти   тёте        лести
SFX Y   стись тётесь      лестись
SFX Y   сти   тёт         лести
SFX Y   стись тётся       лестись
SFX Y   сти   тут         лести
SFX Y   стись тутся       лестись
SFX Y   сти   бу          рести
SFX Y   сти   бём         рести
SFX Y   сти   бёшь        рести
SFX Y   сти   бёте        рести
SFX Y   сти   бёт         рести
SFX Y   сти   бут         рести
SFX Y   чь    гу          чь
SFX Y   чь    жем         чь
SFX Y   чь    жешь        чь
SFX Y   чь    жете        чь
SFX Y   чь    жет         чь
SFX Y   чь    гут         чь

SFX D Y 5
SFX D   ться  ется        [ая]ться
SFX D   ться  ются        [ая]ться
SFX D   ься   ся          иться
SFX D   иться ятся        [^жчшщ]иться
SFX D   иться атся        [жчшщ]иться

SFX B Y 25
SFX B   ть    й           [аея]ть
SFX B   ться  йся         [аея]ться
SFX B   ть    йте         [аея]ть
SFX B   ться  йтесь       [аея]ться
SFX B   ить   и           ить
SFX B   ь     е           ить
SFX B   ться  сь          иться
SFX B   ться  тесь        иться
SFX B   оть   и           оть
SFX B   оть   ите         оть
SFX B   оться ись         оться
SFX B   оться итесь       оться
SFX B   уть   и           уть
SFX B   уть   ите         уть
SFX B   уться ись         уться
SFX B   уться итесь       уться
SFX B   ыть   ой          ыть
SFX B   ыть   ойте        ыть
SFX B   ыться ойся        ыться
SFX B   ыться ойтесь      ыться
SFX B   0     те          [ий]
SFX B   сь    тесь        ись
SFX B   ся    тесь        йся
SFX B   0     те          [^ст]ь
SFX B   ся    тесь        [^т]ься

SFX T Y 38
SFX T   овать уй          овать
SFX T   оваться уйся        оваться
SFX T   овать уйте        овать
SFX T   оваться уйтесь      оваться
SFX T   евать уй          [жшщчц]евать
SFX T   евать уйте        [жшщчц]евать
SFX T   еваться уйся        [жшщчц]еваться
SFX T   еваться уйтесь      [жшщчц]еваться
SFX T   евать юй          [^жшщчц]евать
SFX T   евать юйте        [^жшщчц]евать
SFX T   еваться юйся        [^жшщчц]еваться
SFX T   еваться юйтесь      [^жшщчц]еваться
SFX T   ать   и           [жч]ать
SFX T   аться ись         [жч]аться
SFX T   сать  ши          сать
SFX T   сать  шите        сать
SFX T   саться шись        саться
SFX T   саться шитесь      саться
SFX T   ить   й           [аео]ить
SFX T   ить   йте         [аео]ить
SFX T   иться йся         [аео]иться
SFX T   иться йтесь       [аео]иться
SFX T   ить   ь           [^аео]ить
SFX T   ить   ьте         [^аео]ить
SFX T   иться ься         [^аео]иться
SFX T   иться ьтесь       [^аео]иться
SFX T   уть   ь           уть
SFX T   уть   ьте         уть
SFX T   уться ься         уться
SFX T   уться ьтесь       уться
SFX T   ять   й           [аеоу]ять
SFX T   ять   йте         [аеоу]ять
SFX T   яться йся         [аеоу]яться
SFX T   яться йтесь       [аеоу]яться
SFX T   еть   и           еть
SFX T   еться ись         еться
SFX T   еть   ите         еть
SFX T   еться итесь       еться

SFX P Y 12
SFX P   ть    я           [ае]ть
SFX P   ться  ясь         [ае]ться
SFX P   ть    я           [^аеоу]ять
SFX P   ться  ясь         [^аеоу]яться
SFX P   ять   я           [аеоу]ять
SFX P   ться  сь          [аеоу]яться
SFX P   ить   я           [^жчшщ]ить
SFX P   иться ясь         [^жчшщ]иться
SFX P   ить   а           [жчшщ]ить
SFX P   иться ась         [жчшщ]иться
SFX P   ыть   оя          ыть
SFX P   ыться оясь        ыться

SFX Q Y 6
SFX Q   евать уя          [жшщчц]евать
SFX Q   еваться уясь        [жшщчц]еваться
SFX Q   евать юя          [^жшщчц]евать
SFX Q   еваться юясь        [^жшщчц]еваться
SFX Q   овать уя          овать
SFX Q   оваться уясь        оваться

SFX R Y 4
SFX R   ть    в           [аеиоуыя]ть
SFX R   ться  вшись       [аеиоуыя]ться
SFX R   сть   в           сть
SFX R   сться вшись       сться

SFX Z Y 4
SFX Z   ый    о           [влнрт]ый
SFX Z   ий    и           [сц]кий
SFX Z   ий    е           щий
SFX Z   ий    о           ький
