ru_RU.dic
аккомодироваться/LQ
анархический/AZ
ангажироваться/LQU
аннулировать/LQRTU
ассистировать/LQTU
бандитский/AZ
бдеть/LTY
безумствовать/LQTU
бессословный/AZ
бравировать/LQTU
бренчать/LTU
валютный/AZ
вбивать/BLMP
вволакивать/BLMP
вентилироваться/LQ
взбалтываться/LPD
взбодриться/BLRW
взбунтовать/LRTU
взъерошиваться/LMP
вкапывать/BLMP
влезть/LY
вноситься/LD
воздать/BLRY
возрождать/BLMP
волноваться/LQTU
волокитный/AZ
воплощать/BLMP
вплавиться/LRD
вселять/BLPU
вспахать/LRY
встряхивать/BLMP
втолковываться/LD
втоптать/LRY
вуалироваться/LQU
выброситься/LRTW
вывернуться/BLMR
выдумать/BLMR
вызваниваться/LD
выигрывать/BLMP
выкопать/BLMR
вымениваться/LD
выправиться/BLRTW
выправляться/LPU
выпри/B
выродиться/LRD
выспаться/LRY
выставочный/AZ
высчитать/BLMR
вытрясаться/LD
вытягивать/BLMP
выхолостить/BLRW
гадить/LPTW
гипсовать/LQU
гноиться/LPD
голодноватый/AZ
гравировать/LQTU
греби/B
двоиться/BLPW
дегазировать/LQRTU
декларировать/LQTU
демпфировать/LQRU
диалектический/AZ
дискриминировать/LQRU
довериться/LRTW
догрести/Y
додержаться/LRTU
докажи/B
допрыгивать/LMP
досеиваться/LD
дочертить/BLRW
драить/LPTW
драться/LY
дросселировать/LQU
дрябнуть/BMR
дурацкий/AZ
жертвенный/AZ
забарабанить/LRTW
забривать/LMP
загасить/BLRW
заглаживаться/LPD
заглатывать/BLMP
загримировать/LRTU
зажраться/LRY
заигрываться/BLMP
закамуфлироваться/LRTU
закашлять/BLRU
заклубиться/LD
законопатить/LRTW
замениться/LRW
замышлять/BLPU
занижаться/LPD
запарываться/LPD
запахать/LRY
запроектировать/LRTU
засевать/BLMP
засекаться/LD
засесть/LRY
застенографировать/LRTU
застраивать/BLMP
застынуть/MRT
затрагиваться/LPD
захваливать/BLMP
захныкать/LRY
захрипеть/LRY
зверский/AZ
зеленеть/BLMP
игнорироваться/LQ
извести/LY
изглаживаться/LPD
изгонять/BLPU
издрогнуть/MR
израсходовать/LRTU
имперский/AZ
индоссировать/LQU
интересоваться/LQTU
искушать/BLMP
исполнить/BLRW
истончаться/LPD
исхитриться/BLRW
казаться/LY
каменный/AZ
канализировать/LQU
канителиться/LPTW
колёсный/AZ
колонизировать/LQTU
конкретизировать/LQTU
корёжиться/LPW
короновать/LQTU
корректировать/LQTU
косоватый/AZ
ладиться/LD
ламинировать/LQRU
латать/BLMP
лимонный/AZ
магнетизировать/LQU
мазурничать/LMP
манкировать/LQTU
махать/BLMPY
медицинский/AZ
микрофильмировать/LQTU
молдавский/AZ
мотнуться/BLRU
мульчировать/LQTU
набиваться/BLMP
наворовать/LRTU
наглеть/BLMP
наддать/BLRY
надклеиваться/LD
наживать/BLMP
наиграться/LMR
намекать/BLMP
наораться/LRY
напеваться/LD
напеки/B
наплескать/LMRY
настелить/LRY
наступательный/AZ
натренироваться/LRU
нацеливаться/BLMP
нашпиговать/LRTU
нащупываться/LD
ненасильственный/AZ
несходный/AZ
нормализовать/LQTU
обдать/BLRY
обегать/BLMPR
обеднеть/BLMR
обессоливать/LMP
обиваться/LD
обнадёжить/LRTW
обострять/BLPU
обрушить/LRTW
обтесаться/LRY
обуздать/BLMR
обуславливаться/LPD
объявить/BLRW
обыденный/AZ
одевать/BLMP
окристаллизовать/LRU
омочиться/LRD
оплачивать/BLMP
опустошить/BLRW
оркестровать/LQRTU
орфографический/AZ
осмеиваться/LPD
осмотреться/LRTY
остаться/LRY
осуществлять/BLPU
отгрохать/BLMR
отдёргиваться/LPD
откомандировывать/LMP
отливать/BLMP
отпасть/LRY
отпеваться/LD
отскребать/BLMP
отстучать/LRU
оттопырить/LRTW
отчлениться/LRD
отыгрываться/BLMP
очаровываться/LMP
ошарашивающий/AZ
патрулировать/LQTU
перебрать/LRY
пережарить/LRTW
пережёвывать/BLMP
перезаписываться/LD
переискать/LRY
перекинуть/LMRT
перелистнуть/BLRU
перепархивать/LMP
переплавляться/LPD
пересказать/LRY
переувлажнить/BLRW
перешиваться/LD
пероральный/AZ
пикетировать/LQTU
пласировать/LQRU
побездельничать/BLMR
побыть/LRY
подводный/AZ
подвязать/LRY
поддаваться/BLPU
подержать/LRTU
подкрахмалить/LRTW
подлаживаться/BLMP
подрать/LRY
подровняться/LRD
позарастать/LR
позвякивать/BLMP
покряхтеть/LRTY
полакомиться/LRTW
ползать/LMP
поотбивать/LMR
поплакать/LRY
пополняться/LPD
пороть/BLM
португальский/AZ
посвистеть/LRTY
поскакать/LRY
потревожить/LRTW
пощебетать/LRY
прегрязный/AZ
предводительствовать/LQU
предназначить/LRTW
предусматриваться/LD
предъявлять/BLPU
прибыть/LRY
приваливать/LMP
приземлённый/ASZ
прикончить/BLRW
приостановиться/BLRW
приотстать/LRY
приспособиться/LRTW
притрагиваться/BLMP
причитаться/LPD
пробежаться/LRY
прободрствовать/LRU
проделать/BLMR
продраться/LRY
прожариться/LRTW
пронять/LR
пропагандировать/LQTU
прописаться/LRTY
просвещаться/BLMP
просеиваться/LPD
проставить/LRTW
простелить/LRY
просящий/AZ
протянуть/BLMR
разбухнуть/MR
разгерметизировать/LRTU
разгореться/LRTY
разжиматься/LPD
разматывать/BLMP
разнервничаться/BLMR
разный/AZ
расклёшить/LRW
расписаться/LRTY
расплавиться/LRD
рассортировать/LRTU
расстегнуть/BLRU
рассчитывать/BLMP
расходовать/LQTU
расщепляться/LPD
рвануться/BLRU
резать/LY
резонировать/LQTU
реформаторский/AZ
реэкспортировать/LQRU
румянить/LPTW
саморучный/AZ
семикратный/AZ
сенсибилизировать/LQU
сживать/BLMP
сказать/LRY
сказывать/BLMP
скомплектовать/LRTU
слёживаться/LPD
смазочный/AZ
смастачить/LRW
сожительствовать/LQU
создать/BLRY
сомкнуть/BLRU
сосуществовать/LQTU
спекать/BLMP
стадный/AZ
стартовать/LQRTU
стерпеть/LRTY
стреножить/LRTW
строчиться/LD
сублимировать/LQTU
схематический/AZ
счищать/BLMP
тасовать/LQTU
тональный/AZ
трактовать/LQTU
тревожиться/LPTW
трубить/BLPW
увидеть/LRY
узбекский/AZ
укрепить/BLRW
умилить/BLRW
умножиться/LRD
уползать/BLMP
урегулировать/LRTU
усовершенствовать/LQRTU
ухнуть/BLMR
уширяться/LPD
физиологический/AZ
флуоресцировать/LQ
характеризоваться/LQTU
хмурить/LPTW
ходульный/AZ
числиться/BLPW
чулочный/AZ
шантажировать/LQTU
штурмоваться/LQ
шуметь/LTY
эвакуироваться/LQTU
эксплицировать/LQRU
